Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1213
Licensed water well contractor, defined.

Licensed water well contractor means an individual who has obtained a license from the department and who is a principal officer, director, manager, or owner-operator of any business engaged in the construction or decommissioning of water wells.

Laws 1986, LB 310, § 13;

Laws 2001, LB 667, § 15;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1152.